test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_US_STEM_3.gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_US_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_US_STEM_3

     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kwíijaa
     kus+V+INDIRECT+PAST: kwíijaan
     kus+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kwíijaas
     kus+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kwíijaa.ang
     kus+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: kwíijaa'ahlang
     kus+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kwíijaa'ahlanggaa
     kus+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kwíijaa'ahlanggang
